Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-249
Town clerk; duties and powers; records; papers; oaths.

The town clerk of each town in this state shall have the custody of all records, books and papers of the town, and shall file all certificates of oaths and other papers required by law to be filed in his office. He shall have power to administer the oath of office to all town officers and it is hereby made the duty of the town clerk to administer all oaths which may be required in the transaction of any township business in the town where he may be clerk; Provided, nothing herein shall be so construed as to deprive any other person qualified by law from administering said oaths.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 47, p. 144;

R.S.1913, § 1033;

C.S.1922, § 935;

C.S.1929, § 26-249;

R.S.1943, § 23-249.

Although each township has a township board and township officers, each of which has statutorily prescribed powers and duties, the powers of the township are exercised through direct local self-government. Butler County Dairy v. Butler County, 285 Neb. 408, 827 N.W.2d 267 (2013).